Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6.6 Quality Family Child Care Act

40-6.6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Quality Family Child Care Act of 2013.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth herein, unless the context in which such terms are used clearly indicates to the contrary:

“CCAP” means “Child Care Assistance Program” the program administered by the department of human services that provides financial assistance to families for child care.

“CCAP family childcare provider” means an individual who:

Participates in CCAP as a department of human services CCAP approved provider; and

Is either licensed by the department of children, youth and families to provide childcare services in the provider’s own home, or license exempt but approved by the department of human services to participate in CCAP.

“Director” means the director of the department of administration.

“Provider organization” means an organization that includes CCAP family childcare providers and has as one of its purposes the representation of CCAP family childcare providers in their relations with the state.

“Provider representative” or “representative” means a provider organization that is certified as the exclusive negotiating representative of CCAP family childcare providers as provided in §

40-6.6-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-3.
Child Care Assistance Program Parent Advisory Council.

There is established a Child Care Assistance Program Parent Advisory Council. The council shall consist of seven (7) members, six (6) of whom shall be the parents or guardians of children who participate, or have participated in, CCAP within the two (2) years previous to being appointed to the advisory council. The director of the department of human services, or his or her designee, shall serve on the council and act as its chair. A majority of members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business.

The council members shall be appointed for three-year (3) terms. Two (2) shall be appointed by the governor, two (2) by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two (2) by the president of the senate.

The council shall advise the governor and the director, or his or her designee, and any provider representative regarding issues relating to the quality, affordability, and accessibility of child care offered through CCAP. In particular, the council shall make recommendations regarding:

Strategies for improving quality, affordability, and access to child care for CCAP families; and

The structure of the CCAP program, including, but not limited to, the application and renewal process, eligibility rules and standards, and family co-payment levels.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-4.
Right of CCAP family childcare providers to choose provider representative — Subjects of negotiation.

CCAP family childcare providers may, in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

40-6.6-9

, choose a provider organization to be their provider representative and to negotiate with the director, or his or her designee, over the terms and conditions of CCAP family childcare providers’ participation in CCAP, including, but not limited to: (1) Expanding training and professional development opportunities; (2) Improving the recruitment and retention of qualified CCAP family childcare providers; (3) Reimbursement rates and other economic matters; (4) Benefits; (5) Payment procedures; and (6) A grievance-resolution process.

Notwithstanding the above, all matters within the scope of the department of children, youth and families (DCYF) childcare-licensing regulations and the DCYF’s regulatory authority over childcare licensing shall be excluded from and not subject to negotiations and/or the collective bargaining process as recognized in this section. DCYF’s authority to initiate licensing action pertaining to family childcare providers shall be exclusively governed by provisions in §

42-72.1-6

and chapter 35 of title 42.

Notwithstanding the above, CCAP family childcare providers must first be qualified as CCAP family childcare providers by the department of human services and must operate in conformance with the relevant sections of chapter 12 of title 42 and regulations promulgated by the department.

The director shall work in consultation with the secretary of the executive office of health and human services, as well as the director of the department of human services, regarding the terms and conditions of CCAP family childcare providers’ participation in CCAP including, but not limited to, the terms and conditions in subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-5.
Good-faith negotiations.

It shall be the obligation of the director, or his or her designee, to meet and confer in good faith with the provider representative within thirty (30) days after receipt of written notice from the provider representative of the request for a meeting for bargaining purposes. This obligation shall include the duty to cause any agreement resulting from the negotiations to be reduced to a written contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-6.
Unresolved issues — Impasse procedures.

In the event that the provider representative and the director, or his or her designee, are unable to reach an agreement on a contract, or reach an impasse in negotiations, the procedures of §§

36-11-7.1

through

36-11-11

shall be followed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-7.
Economic aspects of contract subject to legislative appropriation.

Any aspects of a contract requiring appropriation by the federal government, the general assembly, or revisions to statutes and/or regulations shall be subject to passage of those state or federal appropriations or statutory and/or regulatory revisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-8.
Duty to represent all CCAP family childcare providers fairly — Service charge and deductions.

A provider organization certified as the provider representative shall represent all CCAP family childcare providers in the state fairly and without discrimination, without regard to whether or not the CCAP family childcare providers are members of the provider organization.

Each CCAP family childcare provider may choose whether to be a member of the provider organization; provided, however, that after a first contract is ratified, the provider representative shall be authorized to collect from non-member CCAP family childcare providers a service charge as a contribution toward the negotiation and administration of the written contract. The service charge shall not exceed the regular dues paid by CCAP family childcare providers who are members of the provider representative. The state shall deduct the service charge, membership dues, and any voluntary deductions authorized by individual CCAP family childcare providers, from the payments to CCAP family childcare providers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-9.
Certification and decertification of provider organization.

Petitions to certify a provider organization to serve as the provider representative of CCAP family childcare providers, petitions to intervene in the election, and any other petitions for investigation of controversies as to representation may be filed with, and acted upon by, the labor relations board in accordance with the provisions of chapter 7 of title 28 and the board’s rules and regulations; provided that any valid petition as to whether CCAP family childcare providers wish to certify or decertify a provider representative shall be resolved by a secret ballot election among CCAP family childcare providers, for which purpose the board may designate a neutral third party to conduct said secret ballot election.

The only appropriate unit shall consist of all CCAP family childcare providers in the state.

The cost of any certification election held under this section will be split equally among all the provider organizations that appear on the ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 29.

40-6.6-10.
Unfair practices.

It shall be unlawful for the state to do any of the acts made unlawful under §

28-7-13

. It shall be unlawful for the provider representative to do any of the acts made unlawful under §

28-7-13

.1. Any alleged violation of this provision may be filed with the labor relations board as an unfair labor practice and considered and ruled upon in accordance with chapter 7 of title 28 and the board’s rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-11.
CCAP family childcare providers not state employees.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to make CCAP family childcare providers employees of the state for any purpose, including for the purposes of eligibility for the state employee pension program or state employee health benefits.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-12.
Right of families to select, direct, and terminate CCAP family childcare providers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter the rights of families to select, direct, and terminate the services of CCAP family childcare providers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-13.
Strikes not authorized.

CCAP family childcare providers shall not engage in any strike or other collective cessation of the delivery of childcare services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.

40-6.6-14.
State action exemption.

The state action exemption to the application of state and federal antitrust laws is applicable to the activities of CCAP family childcare providers and their provider representative authorized under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 465, § 1.